public_html/app/tools/lang/morphology/dictionaries/vec.aff
FLAG num
SFX A àñer añivense/K romàñer
SFX A àñer añivion/K romàñer
SFX A àñer añivionse/K romàñer
SFX A àñer añivié/O romàñer
SFX A àñer añiviéu/P romàñer
SFX A àñer añivon/K romàñer
SFX A àñer añivonse/K romàñer
SFX A àñer añié/O romàñer
SFX A àñer añiéu/P romàñer
SFX A àñer año/IJ romàñer
SFX A àñer añon/K romàñer
SFX A àñer añone/K romàñer
SFX A àñer añonse/K romàñer
SFX A àñer añua/H romàñer
SFX A àñer añuda/H romàñer
SFX A àñer añude/H romàñer
SFX A àñer añudi/H romàñer
SFX A àñer añudo/H romàñer
SFX A àñer añue/H romàñer
SFX A àñer añui/H romàñer
SFX A àñer añuo/H romàñer
SFX A àñer añé/GO romàñer
SFX A àñer añéa/IOQ romàñer
SFX A àñer añée/I romàñer
SFX A àñer añéelo/R romàñer
SFX A àñer añéi/MO romàñer
SFX A àñer añéimo/K romàñer
SFX A àñer añéimoi/L romàñer
SFX A àñer añéitu/N romàñer
SFX A àñer añéo/I romàñer
SFX A àñer añésimo romàñer
SFX A àñer añéu/P romàñer
SFX A àñer añévelo/R romàñer
SFX A àñer añévimo/K romàñer
SFX A àñer añévimoi/L romàñer
SFX A àñer añévitu/N romàñer
SFX A àñer añí/GO romàñer
SFX A àñer añíu/P romàñer
SFX A àñer añú romàñer
SFX A àŧer aŧa xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧe/HIJQ xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧeai/J xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧeau/P xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧede xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧeei/J xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧege xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧemo/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧemoi/L xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧen/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧendo/EG xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧene/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧense/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧente xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧeoi/J xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧeralo/R xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧeratu/N xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧerave/QS xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧeremo/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧeremoi/L xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧeren/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧerense/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧeresi/O xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧeresiu/P xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧeriai/J xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧeriei/J xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧerimo/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧerimoi/L xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧerion/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧerionse/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧerisen/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧerisense/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧerision/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧerisionse/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧerisié/O xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧerisiéu/P xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧerison/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧerisonse/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧerié/O xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧeriéu/P xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧeron/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧeronse/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧerà/IMQ xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧeràe/Q xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧerài/J xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧerè/I xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧerèi/J xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧeré/O xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧerésimo/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧerésimoi/L xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧeréu/P xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧerí/O xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧería/IMQ xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧeríatu/N xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧeríe/IQ xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧeríelo/R xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧeríu/P xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧerò/I xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧeròi/J xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧese/H xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧesi xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧesta/H xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧeste/H xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧesti/H xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧesto/H xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧeva/IOQ xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧevai/J xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧevau/P xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧeve/I xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧevei/J xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧevi/MO xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧevo/I xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧevoi/J xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧi/EGM xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧimo/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧimoi/L xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧion/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧione/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧionse/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧisen/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧisene/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧisense/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧision/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧisione/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧisionse/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧison/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧisone/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧisonse/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧiven/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧivense/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧivion/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧivionse/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧivié/O xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧiviéu/P xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧivon/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧivonse/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧié/O xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧiéu/P xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧo/IJ xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧon/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧone/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧonse/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧua/H xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧuda/H xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧude/H xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧudi/H xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧudo/H xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧue/H xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧui/H xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧuo/H xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧé/GO xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧéa/IOQ xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧée/I xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧéelo/R xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧéi/MO xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧéimo/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧéimoi/L xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧéitu/N xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧéo/I xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧésimo xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧéu/P xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧévelo/R xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧévimo/K xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧévimoi/L xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧévitu/N xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧí/GO xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧíu/P xàŧer
SFX A àŧer aŧú xàŧer
SFX A èder edeai/J mièder
SFX A èder edeau/P mièder
SFX A èder edede mièder
SFX A èder edeei/J mièder
SFX A èder edege mièder
SFX A èder edemo/K mièder
SFX A èder edemoi/L mièder
SFX A èder eden/K mièder
SFX A èder edendo/EG mièder
SFX A èder edene/K mièder
SFX A èder edense/K mièder
SFX A èder edente mièder
SFX A èder edeoi/J mièder
SFX A èder ederalo/R mièder
SFX A èder ederatu/N mièder
SFX A èder ederave/QS mièder
SFX A èder ederemo/K mièder
SFX A èder ederemoi/L mièder
SFX A èder ederen/K mièder
SFX A èder ederense/K mièder
SFX A èder ederesi/O mièder
SFX A èder ederesiu/P mièder
SFX A èder ederiai/J mièder
SFX A èder ederiei/J mièder
SFX A èder ederimo/K mièder
SFX A èder ederimoi/L mièder
SFX A èder ederion/K mièder
SFX A èder ederionse/K mièder
SFX A èder ederisen/K mièder
SFX A èder ederisense/K mièder
SFX A èder ederision/K mièder
SFX A èder ederisionse/K mièder
SFX A èder ederisié/O mièder
SFX A èder ederisiéu/P mièder
SFX A èder ederison/K mièder
SFX A èder ederisonse/K mièder
SFX A èder ederié/O mièder
SFX A èder ederiéu/P mièder
SFX A èder ederon/K mièder
SFX A èder ederonse/K mièder
SFX A èder ederà/IMQ mièder
SFX A èder ederàe/Q mièder
SFX A èder ederài/J mièder
SFX A èder ederè/I mièder
SFX A èder ederèi/J mièder
SFX A èder ederé/O mièder
SFX A èder ederésimo/K mièder
SFX A èder ederésimoi/L mièder
SFX A èder ederéu/P mièder
SFX A èder ederí/O mièder
SFX A èder edería/IMQ mièder
SFX A èder ederíatu/N mièder
SFX A èder ederíe/IQ mièder
SFX A èder ederíelo/R mièder
SFX A èder ederíu/P mièder
SFX A èder ederò/I mièder
SFX A èder ederòi/J mièder
SFX A èder edese/H mièder
SFX A èder edesi mièder
SFX A èder edesta/H mièder
SFX A èder edeste/H mièder
SFX A èder edesti/H mièder
SFX A èder edesto/H mièder
SFX A èder edeva/IOQ mièder
SFX A èder edevai/J mièder
SFX A èder edevau/P mièder
SFX A èder edeve/I mièder
SFX A èder edevei/J mièder
SFX A èder edevi/MO mièder
SFX A èder edevo/I mièder
SFX A èder edevoi/J mièder
SFX A èder edimo/K mièder
SFX A èder edimoi/L mièder
SFX A èder edion/K mièder
SFX A èder edione/K mièder
SFX A èder edionse/K mièder
SFX A èder edisen/K mièder
SFX A èder edisene/K mièder
SFX A èder edisense/K mièder
SFX A èder edision/K mièder
SFX A èder edisione/K mièder
SFX A èder edisionse/K mièder
SFX A èder edison/K mièder
SFX A èder edisone/K mièder
SFX A èder edisonse/K mièder
SFX A èder ediven/K mièder
SFX A èder edivense/K mièder
SFX A èder edivion/K mièder
SFX A èder edivionse/K mièder
SFX A èder edivié/O mièder
SFX A èder ediviéu/P mièder
SFX A èder edivon/K mièder
SFX A èder edivonse/K mièder
SFX A èder edié/O mièder
SFX A èder ediéu/P mièder
SFX A èder edon/K mièder
SFX A èder edone/K mièder
SFX A èder edonse/K mièder
SFX A èder edua/H mièder
SFX A èder eduda/H mièder
SFX A èder edude/H mièder
SFX A èder edudi/H mièder
SFX A èder edudo/H mièder
SFX A èder edue/H mièder
SFX A èder edui/H mièder
SFX A èder eduo/H mièder
SFX A èder edé/GO mièder
SFX A èder edéa/IOQ mièder
SFX A èder edée/I mièder
SFX A èder edéelo/R mièder
SFX A èder edéi/MO mièder
SFX A èder edéimo/K mièder
SFX A èder edéimoi/L mièder
SFX A èder edéitu/N mièder
SFX A èder edéo/I mièder
SFX A èder edésimo mièder
SFX A èder edéu/P mièder
SFX A èder edévelo/R mièder
SFX A èder edévimo/K mièder
SFX A èder edévimoi/L mièder
SFX A èder edévitu/N mièder
SFX A èder edí/GO mièder
SFX A èder edíu/P mièder
SFX A èder edú mièder
SFX A èguer egua/H sèguer
SFX A èguer eguda/H sèguer
SFX A èguer egude/H sèguer
SFX A èguer egudi/H sèguer
SFX A èguer egudo/H sèguer
SFX A èguer egue/H sèguer
SFX A èguer egueai/J sèguer
