public_html/app/tools/lang/morphology/dictionaries/vec.dic
alar/A
alterar/A
inanelar/A
inarđentar/A
artikolar/A
aŧelerar/A
axear/A
bagatelar/A
inbakukir/A
xbaliđar/A
inbalukar/A
xbanpir/A
barbajar/A
barufar/A
bateđar/A
dexbaular/A
xbefar/A
benedir/A
inbéver/A
biankiđar/A
inkonbinar/A
bisakar/A
xboar/A
abokar/A
bolsar/A
rebonbar/A
bordeđar/A
inboskaɉar/A
inboŧolar/A
inbragetar/A
dexbratar/A
brevetar/A
brivar/A
inbroketar/A
inbrumar/A
rebufar/A
rebutar/A
cakolar/A
scauŧar/A
decèñer/A
koncéñer/A
scikarar/A
scupar/A
dameɉar/A
indemoniar/A
deŧimar/A
dixdisiar/A
docar/A
domandar/A
dexdorar/A
dotorar/A
indurir/A
đavaɉar/A
konđónxer/A
skonđurar/A
eliminar/A
riéser/A
exebir/A
konfar/A
afadegar/A
sfalkar/A
sfangar/A
fataliđar/A
bonifegar/A
ratifegar/A
defénder/A
inferir/A
infestonar/A
infiakir/A
infibiar/A
desfigurar/A
finar/A
sfiorar/A
fiskar/A
influir/A
fojar/A
sfondar/A
formar/A
refornir/A
frajar/A
frànđer/A
fraterniđar/A
fregolar/A
sfritegar/A
fruñar/A
fumar/A
furfar/A
xgabanar/A
dexgalonar/A
xgangir/A
ingarbelar/A
dexgatejar/A
getar/A
godegar/A
xgorbiar/A
gradelar/A
grandeđar/A
grapar/A
xgravar/A
gretolar/A
xgriñar/A
grondar/A
ingrumar/A
xguainar/A
guernar/A
inibir/A
indavalkar/A
ingoxar/A
inproviđar/A
intimar/A
isar/A
justar/A
inɉemar/A
xɉoŧar/A
inkadenar/A
kaiđar/A
skalivar/A
inkalotir/A
kamufar/A
rekanbiar/A
dekanpar/A
deskantonar/A
inkapelar/A
deskapujar/A
kargar/A
karolar/A
kartiđar/A
inkaspar/A
skataronar/A
skaturar/A
prekavar/A
inkaxar/A
koar/A
skojonar/A
deskolar/A
kolpar/A
inkomenŧiar/A
koncar/A
skonkuasar/A
konpletar/A
kontiđar/A
konxeturar/A
okórer/A
akordar/A
inkorlar/A
kortelar/A
inkotegar/A
rekòxer/A
rinkréser/A
krivelar/A
krostinar/A
inkuadrar/A
inkuercar/A
kuestuar/A
inkular/A
rekuperar/A
kuŧolar/A
xlangolir/A
laoratar/A
stralasar/A
xlavaŧar/A
legaliđar/A
deletar/A
lexierir/A
xligar/A
liñar/A
lodar/A
sprolongar/A
luamar/A
lustrar/A
madurar/A
makar/A
xmalŧar/A
inmanetar/A
manxar/A
markar/A
martelar/A
xmaselar/A
matar/A
inmaŧar/A
inmaxerir/A
xmegolar/A
mendar/A
meravejar/A
mestierar/A
manométer/A
mièder/A
aministrar/A
misturar/A
mokaɉar/A
xmoltonar/A
remontar/A
morbar/A
morfir/A
inmortalar/A
komòver/A
tramudarar/A
dexmunegar/A
mustaxar/A
muxonar/A
anaspar/A
renegar/A
niar/A
noleđar/A
nòxer/A
ñaolar/A
obligar/A
oɉar/A
omologar/A
onɉar/A
orbegar/A
orlar/A
osixenar/A
pacarar/A
pagar/A
inpaketar/A
spaletar/A
despaltanar/A
spanocar/A
papuŧar/A
reaparir/A
sparlar/A
partikolariđar/A
trapasar/A
pastroŧar/A
spatriar/A
spaveɉar/A
pedotar/A
inpelar/A
penar/A
pénđer/A
despensar/A
repeonar/A
perlar/A
repeskar/A
peteđar/A
spetorar/A
kontrapexar/A
pianđotar/A
piegar/A
inpikolir/A
despionbar/A
piriar/A
pistoređar/A
inpiŧolar/A
poer/A
inpoltronir/A
apóner/A
repóner/A
inpongar/A
pontelar/A
ponxetar/A
soportar/A
postar/A
potenŧiar/A
predegar/A
presostatar/A
prexenŧiar/A
profetiđar/A
proviđar/A
inpuñar/A
putanar/A
skorabiar/A
rakordar/A
rancinar/A
ranđar/A
rascar/A
receđar/A
regaliđar/A
renunŧiar/A
rexiduar/A
risar/A
derobar/A
roersar/A
arolar/A
ronkiđar/A
inrosir/A
rovinar/A
ruimar/A
iruvidir/A
saetar/A
sakosar/A
saleđar/A
saltarar/A
sanɉotar/A
insatanasar/A
scafiđar/A
scordir/A
resekar/A
inseguir/A
perseguitar/A
inseɉar/A
semolar/A
konsentir/A
señorar/A
aservir/A
malsestar/A
sialar/A
sifolar/A
sinkopar/A
sitar/A
skalvar/A
deskarpiar/A
skarsiđar/A
skiantar/A
skoetar/A
skòter/A
reskríver/A
sodar/A
konsolar/A
solŧar/A
sonakiar/A
sorbetar/A
spalankar/A
sparpajar/A
spedir/A
inspesir/A
spigar/A
inspirar/A
spoɉar/A
sprotar/A
kontrastar/A
kontrastaɉar/A
kontrastanpar/A
restaurar/A
istigar/A
stirpar/A
stivalar/A
restorar/A
destranir/A
restrénđer/A
strisar/A
strufiñar/A
instukar/A
suar/A
sufragar/A
superar/A
sustar/A
tajar/A
stajuŧar/A
intanbuxar/A
tartufolar/A
destegolar/A
intenperar/A
aparteñir/A
atéñer/A
esterminar/A
tinpanar/A
toler/A
intorbidir/A
torxiar/A
trabukar/A
trarar/A
tremar/A
trionfar/A
trukar/A
inŧanpar/A
konŧentrar/A
inŧetar/A
reŧiñar/A
ŧotiñar/A
uŧar/A
xvalixar/A
vastar/A
xveɉar/A
ventilar/A
vèñer/A
vergar/A
pervertir/A
vexetar/A
xviñar/A
vixitar/A
voltar/A
traxalir/A
xbrisar/A
xgañar/A
xmorfiar/A
